Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.005

Annexations beyond urban growth areas prohibited.

No city or town located in a county in which urban growth areas have been designated under RCW 36.70A.110 may annex territory beyond an urban growth area.

[ 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 30.]

NOTES:

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.